Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,239
Nebraska Pure Food Act; provisions included; how cited.

Sections 81-2,239 to 81-2,292 and the provisions of the Food Code and the Current Good Manufacturing Practice adopted by reference in sections 81-2,257.01 and 81-2,259, shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Pure Food Act.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 5;

Laws 1989, LB 548, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 81-216.01;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 8;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 55;

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 474, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 250, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 1045, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 131, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB74, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB771, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB798, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB134, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB304, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB562, § 24;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 28;

Laws 2025, LB245, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB246, § 1.